District of Columbia statutes.
2-1223

Repealed.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 121, 51 DCR 9142
Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-257, § 3(a)(4), 52 DCR 1161
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 121 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2(d) of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Clarification Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-64, April 20, 2005, 52 DCR 4135).